Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-6503
Pet insurer; definitions; limitations or exclusions; use.

(1) A pet insurer that uses any of the terms defined in section 44-6504 in a policy of pet insurance shall use such terms as the terms are defined in section 44-6504. A pet insurer shall also make the specific definitions available through a clear and conspicuous link on the main page of the website of the pet insurer or pet insurer's program administrator.

(2) Nothing in the Pet Insurance Act shall prohibit or limit the types of exclusions a pet insurer may use in a pet insurance policy or require a pet insurer to use in a pet insurance policy any limitation or exclusion set forth in the Pet Insurance Act.

Laws 2023, LB296, § 3.